Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1053.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of September 30, 1983 (P.L.160, No.39), known as the Public Official Compensation Law, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 5.4. Limitations on certain additional expenses of the General Assembly.(a) Prohibition on per diem payments.--Any payment made to a member of the General Assembly that is a per diem payment, or would be considered a per diem payment under 26 U.S.C. (relating 12345678910111213141516171819202122 to Internal Revenue Code) , for days of service shall be prohibited. Only actual expenses shall be reimbursable to an individual member upon the receipt of documentation of the expense.(b) Limitations.--This section shall only apply to payments made for individual days of service. This section shall not impact any other form of compensation, including salary, benefits or reimbursed expenses.Section 2. All rules and regulations are abrogated insofar as they are inconsistent with the addition of section 5.4 of the act.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1053PN1142 - 2 - 123456789101112